Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202573-1112
Process for selecting construction manager and entering into contract.

The process for selecting a construction manager and entering into a construction manager-general contractor contract shall be in accordance with sections 73-1113 to 73-1116.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 12.